North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-02.1 Health Statistics Act

23-02.1-01.
Definitions.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter:

“Authorized representative” means a person that has the legal authority to act on behalf of the person named on a record, including a personal representative or guardian.

“Certified” means a copy of the original record on file with the state department of health which is signed and sealed by the state registrar or deputy state registrar.

“Dead body” means a lifeless human body or parts of such body or bones thereof from the state of which it may reasonably be concluded that death recently occurred.

“Electronic birth registration system” means the electronic birth registration system maintained by the state department of health.

“Electronic death registration system” means the electronic death registration system maintained by the state department of health.

“Facts of death” means the demographic and personal information pertaining to an individual’s death.

“Fetal death” or “birth resulting in stillbirth” means death occurring before the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception. The death is indicated by the fact that after such expulsion or extraction the fetus does not breathe or show any evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles.

“Filing” means the presentation of a record, report, or other information provided for in this chapter of a birth, death, fetal death, adoption, marriage, divorce, or other event as specified by the state health officer for registration by the state registrar.

“Final disposition” means the entombment, burial, interment, cremation, whole-body donation to a school of medicine, removal from the state, or other disposition of a dead body or fetus.

“Health statistics” means data derived from records of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, or other records relating to the health of the populace or the state of the environment.

“Institution” means any establishment, public or private, which provides inpatient medical, surgical, or diagnostic care or treatment, or nursing, custodial, or domiciliary care to two or more individuals unrelated by blood, or to which individuals are committed by law.

“Live birth” means the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, which after such expulsion or extraction, breathes or shows any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not the umbilical cord has been cut or the placenta is attached.

“Medical certification” means the medical information pertaining to an individual’s death, including the cause and manner of death.

“Miscarriage of birth” means the expulsion of a fetus from the womb, spontaneously or as a result of an accident, before twenty weeks gestation.

“Personal or real property interests” means ownership or other legal rights or duties concerning personal or real property.

“Physician” means an individual authorized or licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy under chapter 43-17.

“Registration” means the acceptance by the state registrar and incorporation into official records, reports, or other records provided for in this chapter, of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, or other records as may be determined by the state health officer.

“Relative” means an individual’s current or surviving spouse, a parent or legal guardian, a child, a grandparent, or a grandchild. The state registrar may require proof of the relationship.

“Subregistrar” means a funeral practitioner or other suitable individual from a licensed funeral home who is appointed by the state registrar for the purpose of issuing final disposition-transit permits.

“System of health statistics tabulation and analysis” includes the tabulation, analysis, and presentation or publication of statistical data derived from health statistics.

“System of vital records registration” includes the registration, collection, preservation, amendment, and certification of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, or other records as may be determined necessary by the state health officer or the state health officer’s designee.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 1; 2007, ch. 234, § 1; 2015, ch. 188, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 187, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 92, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Fireproof vaults for storage of birth and death certificates, see N.D.C.C. § 23-01-10.

State health officer, qualifications, salary, term, duties, see N.D.C.C. § 23-01-05.

23-02.1-01.
Definitions.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter:

“Authorized representative” means a person that has the legal authority to act on behalf of the person named on a record, including a personal representative or guardian.

“Certified” means a copy of the original record on file with the department of health and human services which is signed and sealed by the state registrar or deputy state registrar.

“Dead body” means a lifeless human body or parts of such body or bones thereof from the state of which it may reasonably be concluded that death recently occurred.

“Electronic birth registration system” means the electronic birth registration system maintained by the department of health and human services.

“Electronic death registration system” means the electronic death registration system maintained by the department of health and human services.

“Facts of death” means the demographic and personal information pertaining to an individual’s death.

“Fetal death” or “birth resulting in stillbirth” means death occurring before the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception. The death is indicated by the fact that after such expulsion or extraction the fetus does not breathe or show any evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles.

“Filing” means the presentation of a record, report, or other information provided for in this chapter of a birth, death, fetal death, adoption, marriage, divorce, or other event as specified by the state health officer for registration by the state registrar.

“Final disposition” means the entombment, burial, interment, cremation, whole-body donation to a school of medicine, removal from the state, or other disposition of a dead body or fetus.

“Health statistics” means data derived from records of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, or other records relating to the health of the populace or the state of the environment.

“Institution” means any establishment, public or private, which provides inpatient medical, surgical, or diagnostic care or treatment, or nursing, custodial, or domiciliary care to two or more individuals unrelated by blood, or to which individuals are committed by law.

“Live birth” means the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, which after such expulsion or extraction, breathes or shows any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not the umbilical cord has been cut or the placenta is attached.

“Medical certification” means the medical information pertaining to an individual’s death, including the cause and manner of death.

“Miscarriage of birth” means the expulsion of a fetus from the womb, spontaneously or as a result of an accident, before twenty weeks gestation.

“Personal or real property interests” means ownership or other legal rights or duties concerning personal or real property.

“Physician” means an individual authorized or licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy under chapter 43-17.

“Registration” means the acceptance by the state registrar and incorporation into official records, reports, or other records provided for in this chapter, of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, or other records as may be determined by the state health officer.

“Relative” means an individual’s current or surviving spouse, a parent or legal guardian, a child, a grandparent, or a grandchild. The state registrar may require proof of the relationship.

“Subregistrar” means a funeral practitioner or other suitable individual from a licensed funeral home who is appointed by the state registrar for the purpose of issuing final disposition-transit permits.

“System of health statistics tabulation and analysis” includes the tabulation, analysis, and presentation or publication of statistical data derived from health statistics.

“System of vital records registration” includes the registration, collection, preservation, amendment, and certification of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, or other records as may be determined necessary by the state health officer or the state health officer’s designee.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 1; 2007, ch. 234, § 1; 2015, ch. 188, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 187, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 92, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 141, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-02.
Office of statistical services.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

There is hereby established in the state department of health an office of statistical services which shall install, maintain, and operate a system of health statistics tabulation and analysis and a system of vital records registration throughout the state. The state health officer may create within the office of statistical services such working divisions as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of this chapter and shall appoint the directors of such divisions in accordance with the merit system laws and regulations of the state of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

Central personnel system, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-44.3.

23-02.1-02.
Office of statistical services. [Effective September 1, 2022]

There is hereby established in the department of health and human services an office of statistical services which shall install, maintain, and operate a system of health statistics tabulation and analysis and a system of vital records registration throughout the state. The executive director of the department of health and human services or designee may create within the office of statistical services such working divisions as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of this chapter and shall appoint the directors of such divisions in accordance with the merit system laws and regulations of the state of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 142, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-02.1.
Birth, marriage, fetal death, and death records — Transition to electronic birth registration system and electronic death registration system.

Beginning January 1, 2008, all new birth, fetal death, and death certificates must be filed with the state registrar and maintained as birth, fetal death, or death records. The state registrar shall issue certified copies of any birth, fetal death, or death record, or informational copies of death and marriage records, to those persons entitled to the record in accordance with this chapter.

A certified copy of a birth, marriage, fetal death, or death record is considered to meet the requirements of any law requiring a birth, marriage, fetal death, or death certificate.

All birth, marriage, fetal death, and death certificates created or issued before January 1, 2008, remain legally valid if the certificate was valid under prior law.

Any reference to a birth, marriage, fetal death, and death record includes any birth, marriage, fetal death, and death certificate issued before January 1, 2008.

Amendments to birth records issued before 2006 and fetal death or death records issued before 2008 must be made according to the procedures and processes used at the time the original record was created.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 234, § 2.

23-02.1-03.
Director of the office of statistical services and associative duties, state and deputy state registrars.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state health officer shall appoint a director of the office of statistical services, in accordance with the merit system laws and regulations of the state of North Dakota, who must be the ex officio state registrar of vital statistics. The deputy state registrar of vital statistics must also be appointed by the state health officer. The director of the office of statistical services shall administer and enforce this chapter and the rules and regulations issued hereunder, and issue instructions for the efficient administration of a statewide system of health statistics tabulation and analysis and a statewide system of vital records registration. The director of the office of statistical services may delegate such functions and duties vested in the director to the officers and employees of the office of statistical services as the director deems necessary and expedient.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 3.

23-02.1-03.
Director of the office of statistical services and associative duties, state and deputy state registrars.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The executive director of the department of health and human services or designee shall appoint a director of the office of statistical services, in accordance with the merit system laws and regulations of the state of North Dakota, who must be the ex officio state registrar of vital statistics. The deputy state registrar of vital statistics must also be appointed by the executive director of the department of health and human services or designee. The director of the office of statistical services shall administer and enforce this chapter and the rules and regulations issued hereunder, and issue instructions for the efficient administration of a statewide system of health statistics tabulation and analysis and a statewide system of vital records registration. The director of the office of statistical services may delegate such functions and duties vested in the director to the officers and employees of the office of statistical services as the director deems necessary and expedient.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 3; 2021, ch. 352, § 143, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-04.
Duties of the state department of health.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health is authorized to adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

23-02.1-04.
Duties of the department.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 144, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-05.
Duties of the state registrar.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state registrar shall:

Direct and supervise the statewide system of vital records and registration and be the primary custodian of said records.

Direct, supervise, and control the activities of subregistrars and the activities of other local officials related to the operation of the vital records registration system.

Prescribe, with the approval of the state department of health, and distribute such forms as required by this chapter and the rules and regulations issued hereunder.

The deputy state registrar shall possess the powers of the state registrar during the registrar’s absence, delegation, inability to act, or during the time there is a vacancy in the office.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 5; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 3.

Cross-References.

Fireproof vaults for storage of birth and death certificates, see N.D.C.C. § 23-01-10.

23-02.1-05.
Duties of the state registrar.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The state registrar shall:

Direct and supervise the statewide system of vital records and registration and be the primary custodian of said records.

Direct, supervise, and control the activities of subregistrars and the activities of other local officials related to the operation of the vital records registration system.

Prescribe, with the approval of the department of health and human services, and distribute such forms as required by this chapter and the rules and regulations issued hereunder.

The deputy state registrar shall possess the powers of the state registrar during the registrar’s absence, delegation, inability to act, or during the time there is a vacancy in the office.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 5; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 3; 2021, ch. 352, § 145, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-06.
Registration districts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 234, § 29.

23-02.1-07.
Duties of local registrars. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 234, § 29.

23-02.1-08.
Duties of subregistrars.

A subregistrar may issue final disposition-transit permits for those counties served by the funeral home the subregistrar is employed by. The subregistrar or cemetery sexton shall file all completed final disposition-transit permits with the county recorder in the county where the final disposition took place within ten days after the date of final disposition or within the time prescribed by the local board of health. The subregistrar is subject to the supervision and control of the state registrar and may be removed by the state registrar for reasonable cause. The subregistrar is subject to the penalties for neglect of duties as provided in section 23-02.1-32.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 8; 2007, ch. 234, § 4; 2017, ch. 92, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

23-02.1-09.
Compensation of local registrars. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 234, § 29.

23-02.1-10.
Payment of fees to the local registrar. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 234, § 29.

23-02.1-11.
Form of records.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The form of the records, reports, and other information required by this chapter is subject to the approval of and modification by the state department of health. In order to maintain uniformity in the system of vital records registration and the system of health statistics tabulation and analysis, substantial efforts should be made to ensure that information collected parallels that collected by other primary registration areas.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 11; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 5.

23-02.1-11.
Form of records.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The form of the records, reports, and other information required by this chapter is subject to the approval of and modification by the department of health and human services. In order to maintain uniformity in the system of vital records registration and the system of health statistics tabulation and analysis, substantial efforts should be made to ensure that information collected parallels that collected by other primary registration areas.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 11; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 5; 2021, ch. 352, § 146, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-12.
Date of registration.

Each record, report, and other information required to be filed under this chapter must have entered upon its face the date of registration duly attested.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 12; 2007, ch. 234, § 6.

23-02.1-13.
Birth registration.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

A birth record for each live birth that occurs in this state must be filed with the state registrar.

When a birth occurs in an institution, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative must use the state department of health’s electronic birth registration system to report the birth, including all personal and medical facts, to the state registrar within five days after the birth.

When a birth occurs outside an institution, the required forms prescribed by the state department of health must be prepared and filed with the state registrar, within thirty days of the birth by one of the following in the indicated order of priority:

The physician in attendance at or immediately after the birth, or in the absence of such an individual;

Any other individual in attendance at or immediately after the birth, or in the absence of such an individual; or

The father, the mother, or in the absence of the father and the inability of the mother, the individual in charge of the premises where the birth occurred.

If a man and the mother are or have been married or have attempted to marry each other in apparent compliance with law, although the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and the child is born during the marriage or attempted marriage, or within three hundred days after the termination of cohabitation or after the marriage or attempted marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, or divorce, or after a decree of separation is entered by a court, the name of the man must be entered on the record as the father of the child unless the presumption of paternity has been rebutted by a court decree.

If the child is not born during the marriage of the mother, or within three hundred days after a marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, or divorce, or after a decree of separation is entered by a court, the name of the father may not be entered on the birth record unless:

After the child’s birth, the father and the child’s natural mother have married, or attempted to marry, each other by a marriage solemnized in apparent compliance with law, although the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and:

He has acknowledged his paternity of the child in writing filed with the state registrar; or

He is obligated to support the child under a written voluntary promise or by court order;

After the child’s birth, the child’s natural mother and the father voluntarily acknowledge the child’s paternity on a form prescribed by the state department of health, signed by the child’s natural mother and biological father, and filed with the state registrar; or

A court or other entity of competent jurisdiction has adjudicated paternity.

If, in accordance with subsections 4 and 5, the name of the father of the child is not entered on the birth record, the child’s surname must be shown on the birth record as the current legal surname of the mother at the time of birth unless an affidavit or an acknowledgment of paternity signed by both parents is filed with the state department of health.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 13; 1979, ch. 311, § 1; 1997, ch. 404, § 44; 2001, ch. 232, § 3; 2005, ch. 135, § 10; 2007, ch. 234, § 7; 2015, ch. 188, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Proceeding to establish date and place of birth, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-37.

Collateral References.

Rights and remedies of parents inter se with respect to the names of their children, 40 A.L.R.5th 697.

23-02.1-13.
Birth registration.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

A birth record for each live birth that occurs in this state must be filed with the state registrar.

When a birth occurs in an institution, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative must use the department of health and human services’ electronic birth registration system to report the birth, including all personal and medical facts, to the state registrar within five days after the birth.

When a birth occurs outside an institution, the required forms prescribed by the department of health and human services must be prepared and filed with the state registrar, within thirty days of the birth by one of the following in the indicated order of priority:

The physician in attendance at or immediately after the birth, or in the absence of such an individual;

Any other individual in attendance at or immediately after the birth, or in the absence of such an individual; or

The father, the mother, or in the absence of the father and the inability of the mother, the individual in charge of the premises where the birth occurred.

If a man and the mother are or have been married or have attempted to marry each other in apparent compliance with law, although the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and the child is born during the marriage or attempted marriage, or within three hundred days after the termination of cohabitation or after the marriage or attempted marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, or divorce, or after a decree of separation is entered by a court, the name of the man must be entered on the record as the father of the child unless the presumption of paternity has been rebutted by a court decree.

If the child is not born during the marriage of the mother, or within three hundred days after a marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, or divorce, or after a decree of separation is entered by a court, the name of the father may not be entered on the birth record unless:

After the child’s birth, the father and the child’s natural mother have married, or attempted to marry, each other by a marriage solemnized in apparent compliance with law, although the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and:

He has acknowledged his paternity of the child in writing filed with the state registrar; or

He is obligated to support the child under a written voluntary promise or by court order;

After the child’s birth, the child’s natural mother and the father voluntarily acknowledge the child’s paternity on a form prescribed by the department of health and human services, signed by the child’s natural mother and biological father, and filed with the state registrar; or

A court or other entity of competent jurisdiction has adjudicated paternity.

If, in accordance with subsections 4 and 5, the name of the father of the child is not entered on the birth record, the child’s surname must be shown on the birth record as the current legal surname of the mother at the time of birth unless an affidavit or an acknowledgment of paternity signed by both parents is filed with the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 13; 1979, ch. 311, § 1; 1997, ch. 404, § 44; 2001, ch. 232, § 3; 2005, ch. 135, § 10; 2007, ch. 234, § 7; 2015, ch. 188, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 147, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-14.
Infants of unknown parentage — Foundling registration.

Whoever assumes custody of a living infant of unknown parentage shall report using the electronic birth registration system or on a form and in the manner prescribed by the state registrar within seven days to the state registrar the following information:

The date and place of finding.

Sex, color, or race, and approximate age of child and approximate date of birth.

Name and address of the persons or institution with whom the child has been placed for care.

Name given to the child by the custodian.

Other data required by the state registrar.

The place where the child was found must be entered as the place of birth and the date of birth must be determined by approximation.

A report registered under this section constitutes the birth record for the infant.

If the child is identified and a birth record is found or obtained, any report registered under this section must be sealed and filed and may be opened only by order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as provided by regulation.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 14; 2001, ch. 232, § 4; 2007, ch. 234, § 8.

23-02.1-15.
Delayed registration of birth.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

When the birth of an individual born in this state has not been registered, a record may be filed in accordance with the regulations of the state department of health. Such record must be registered subject to such evidentiary requirements as the state department of health shall prescribe to substantiate the alleged facts of birth.

Records of birth registered one year or more after the date of occurrence must be marked “delayed” and show on the face of the record the date of delayed registration.

A summary statement of the evidence submitted in support of the delayed registration must be endorsed on the record.

When an applicant does not submit the minimum documentation required in the regulations for delayed registration or when the state registrar finds reason to question the validity or adequacy of the record or documentary evidence, the state registrar may not register the delayed record and shall advise the applicant of the reasons for this action. In the event that the deficiencies are not corrected, the state registrar shall advise the applicant of the right of appeal to a court of competent jurisdiction for a judicial determination of the birth facts.

The state department of health may by regulation provide for the dismissal of an application that is more than one year old and is not being actively pursued.

A report of live birth may not be registered for a deceased individual one year or more after that individual’s date of birth.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 15; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 9; 2015, ch. 188, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

23-02.1-15.
Delayed registration of birth.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

When the birth of an individual born in this state has not been registered, a record may be filed in accordance with the regulations of the department of health and human services. Such record must be registered subject to such evidentiary requirements as the department of health and human services shall prescribe to substantiate the alleged facts of birth.

Records of birth registered one year or more after the date of occurrence must be marked “delayed” and show on the face of the record the date of delayed registration.

A summary statement of the evidence submitted in support of the delayed registration must be endorsed on the record.

When an applicant does not submit the minimum documentation required in the regulations for delayed registration or when the state registrar finds reason to question the validity or adequacy of the record or documentary evidence, the state registrar may not register the delayed record and shall advise the applicant of the reasons for this action. In the event that the deficiencies are not corrected, the state registrar shall advise the applicant of the right of appeal to a court of competent jurisdiction for a judicial determination of the birth facts.

The department of health and human services may by regulation provide for the dismissal of an application that is more than one year old and is not being actively pursued.

A report of live birth may not be registered for a deceased individual one year or more after that individual’s date of birth.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 15; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 9; 2015, ch. 188, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 148, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-16.
Delayed registration of death.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

When a death occurring in this state has not been registered within the time period specified in section 23-02.1-19, a record may be filed in accordance with regulations of the state department of health.

Such records must be registered subject to such evidentiary requirements as the state department of health may by regulation prescribe to substantiate the alleged facts of death.

Records of death registered one year or more after the date of occurrence must be marked “delayed” and must show on their face the date of delayed registration.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 16; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 48, § 20; 2007, ch. 234, § 10.

23-02.1-16.
Delayed registration of death.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

When a death occurring in this state has not been registered within the time period specified in section 23-02.1-19, a record may be filed in accordance with regulations of the department of health and human services.

Such records must be registered subject to such evidentiary requirements as the department of health and human services may by regulation prescribe to substantiate the alleged facts of death.

Records of death registered one year or more after the date of occurrence must be marked “delayed” and must show on their face the date of delayed registration.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 16; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 48, § 20; 2007, ch. 234, § 10; 2021, ch. 352, § 149, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-17.
Court reports of adoption.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

For each adoption decreed by any court in this state, the court shall require the preparation of a report of adoption on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar. The report must include such facts as are necessary to locate and identify the birth record for the person adopted; provide information necessary to establish a new birth record for the person adopted; and must identify the order of adoption and be certified by the clerk of court.

Information in the possession of the petitioner necessary to prepare the adoption report must be furnished with the petition for adoption by each petitioner for adoption or petitioner’s attorney. The department of human services or other persons concerned shall supply the court with such additional information as may be necessary to complete the report. The provision of such information is a prerequisite to the issuance of a final decree.

Whenever an adoption decree is amended or annulled, the clerk of court shall prepare a report thereof, which must include the facts necessary to identify the original adoption report and the facts amended in the adoption decree as are necessary to properly amend the birth record.

Not later than the fifth day of each calendar month, the clerk of court shall forward to the state registrar reports of decrees of adoptions, annulment of adoption, or amendments thereof entered in the preceding month, together with such related reports as the state registrar shall require.

When the state registrar shall receive a report of adoption or annulment of adoption or amendment thereof from a court for a person born in the United States but outside this state, such report must be forwarded to the appropriate registration authority in the state of birth.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 17; 1979, ch. 202, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 11.

23-02.1-17.
Court reports of adoption.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

For each adoption decreed by any court in this state, the court shall require the preparation of a report of adoption on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar. The report must include such facts as are necessary to locate and identify the birth record for the person adopted; provide information necessary to establish a new birth record for the person adopted; and must identify the order of adoption and be certified by the clerk of court.

Information in the possession of the petitioner necessary to prepare the adoption report must be furnished with the petition for adoption by each petitioner for adoption or petitioner’s attorney. The department of health and human services or other persons concerned shall supply the court with such additional information as may be necessary to complete the report. The provision of such information is a prerequisite to the issuance of a final decree.

Whenever an adoption decree is amended or annulled, the clerk of court shall prepare a report thereof, which must include the facts necessary to identify the original adoption report and the facts amended in the adoption decree as are necessary to properly amend the birth record.

Not later than the fifth day of each calendar month, the clerk of court shall forward to the state registrar reports of decrees of adoptions, annulment of adoption, or amendments thereof entered in the preceding month, together with such related reports as the state registrar shall require.

When the state registrar shall receive a report of adoption or annulment of adoption or amendment thereof from a court for a person born in the United States but outside this state, such report must be forwarded to the appropriate registration authority in the state of birth.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 17; 1979, ch. 202, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 11; 2021, ch. 352, § 150, effective September 1, 2022.